Colorado, session 2026A, HB1208.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, repeal
(17)(a)(I); and add (27) as follows:
2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(17) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2026:
(I) The compliance advisory panel to the air pollution control
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

division created in section 25-7-109.2, C.R.S.;
(27) (a) THE FOLLOWING STATUTORY AUTHORIZATIONS FOR THE
DESIGNATED ADVISORY COMMITTEES WILL REPEAL ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2036:
(I) THE COMPLIANCE ADVISORY PANEL TO THE AIR POLLUTION
CONTROL DIVISION CREATED IN SECTION 25-7-109.2.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (27) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1,
2038.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-109.2, amend (6)
as follows:
25-7-109.2. Small business stationary source technical and
environmental compliance assistance program - rules - advisory panel
- legislative declaration.
(6) The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that this
section is enacted for purposes of compliance with the provisions of section
507 of the federal act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 7661f. Subsections (2), (3), and (4) of
this section and this subsection (6) are repealed, effective September 1,
2026 2036. Prior to said repeal, the compliance advisory panel shall be
reviewed by a legislative committee of reference, designated pursuant to
section 2-3-1201, C.R.S., to conduct the review pursuant to section
2-3-1203. C.R.S.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1208

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1208